California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(b) All short-term residential therapeutic programs that serve children who have either been assessed as meeting the medical necessity criteria for Medi-Cal specialty mental health services, as provided for in Section 1830.205 or 1830.210 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations, or who have been assessed and diagnosed with a serious emotional
 disturbance as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 5600.3, shall obtain and have in good standing a mental health program approval and a Medi-Cal mental health certification, as described in Section 11462.01, issued by the State Department of Health Care Services or a county mental health plan to which the department has delegated approval authority. This approval, which is required pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1562.01 of the Health and Safety Code, is a condition for receiving an Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care rate pursuant to Section 11462.01.

(c) (1) A short-term residential therapeutic program shall not directly provide specialty mental health services without a current mental health program approval. A licensed short-term residential therapeutic program that has not obtained a program approval shall provide children in its care access to appropriate mental
 health services.

(2) County mental health plans shall ensure that Medi-Cal specialty mental health services, including, but not limited to, services under the Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis and Treatment benefit, are provided to all Medi-Cal beneficiaries served by short-term residential therapeutic programs who meet medical necessity criteria, as provided for in Section 1830.205 or 1830.210 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations.

(d) (1) The State Department of Health Care Services or a county mental health plan to which the department has delegated mental health program approval authority shall approve or deny mental health program approval requests within 45 days of receiving a request. The State Department of Health Care Services or a county mental health plan to which the department has delegated mental health program approval
 authority shall issue each mental health program approval for a period of one year, except for approvals granted pursuant to paragraph (2) and provisional approvals granted pursuant to regulations promulgated under subdivision (e), and shall specify the effective date of the approval. Approved entities shall meet all program standards to be reapproved.

(2) (A) Between January 1, 2017, and December 31, 2017, the State Department of Health Care Services, or a county mental health plan to which the department has delegated mental health program approval authority, shall approve or deny a mental health program approval request within 90 days of receipt.

(B) Between January 1, 2017, and December 31, 2017, the State Department of Health Care Services, or a county mental health plan to which the department has delegated mental health program approval authority, may
 issue a mental health program approval for a period of less than one year.

(e) (1) The State Department of Health Care Services and the county mental health plans to which the department has delegated mental health program approval authority may enforce the mental health program approval standards by taking any of the following actions against a noncompliant short-term residential therapeutic program:

(A) Suspend or revoke a mental health program approval.

(B) Impose monetary penalties.

(C) Place a mental health program on probation.

(D) Require a mental health program to prepare and comply with a corrective action plan.

(2) The State Department of Health Care Services and the county mental health plans to which the department has delegated mental health program approval authority shall provide short-term residential therapeutic programs with due process protections when taking any of the actions described in paragraph (1).

(f) The State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with the State Department of Social Services, shall promulgate regulations regarding program standards, oversight, enforcement, issuance of mental health program approvals, including provisional approvals that are effective for a period of less than one year, and due process protections related to the mental health program approval process for short-term residential therapeutic programs.

(g) (1) Except for mental health program
 approval of short-term residential therapeutic programs operated by a county, the State Department of Health Care Services may, upon the request of a county, delegate to that county mental health plan the mental health program approval of short-term residential therapeutic programs within its borders.

(2) Any county to which mental health program approval is delegated pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be responsible for the oversight and enforcement of program standards and the provision of due process for approved and denied entities.

(h) The State Department of Health Care Services or a county mental health plan to which the department has delegated mental health program approval authority shall notify the State Department of Social Services immediately upon the termination of any mental health program approval issued in accordance with subdivisions (b) and (d).

(i) The State Department of Social Services shall notify the State Department of Health Care Services and, if applicable, a county to which the department has delegated mental health program approval authority, immediately upon the revocation of any license issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(j) Revocation of a license or a mental health program approval or failure to meet the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 1562.01 of the Health and Safety Code shall be a basis for rate termination.

(k) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (f), pursuant to Section 5963.05, the State Department of Health Care Services may develop and revise documentation standards to be consistent with the standards developed pursuant to paragraph (3) of
 subdivision (h) of Section 14184.402.

(2) The department shall require short-term residential therapeutic programs to implement the documentation standards developed pursuant to paragraph (1) and shall monitor compliance with these standards as part of program reviews.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 6.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4096.55.

(a) The State Department of Social Services, in collaboration with the State Department of Health Care Services, shall make available nursing resources intended to assist short-term residential therapeutic programs with meeting the needs of any child, minor, or nonminor dependent residing in the program placed by a county child welfare agency or probation department.

(b) Nursing resources established pursuant to this section may include both of the following:

(1) A contract that provides for access to nursing services 24 hours a day, 7 days a week.

(2) Any other nursing resources, as identified by the State
 Department of Social Services, in collaboration with the State Department of Health Care Services and in consultation with the Department of Finance, designed to assist short-term residential therapeutic programs to meet the medical needs of any child, minor, or nonminor dependent residing in the program placed by a county child welfare agency or probation department.

(c) If a child requires regular onsite nursing care, the placing agency shall ensure the nursing care is provided, either by the provider consistent with their treatment model, or by the county arranging for that care to be provided utilizing their nursing resources.

(d) (1) The State Department of Social Services, in collaboration with the State Department of Health Care Services, shall issue necessary guidance for the statewide or regional short-term residential therapeutic program nursing
 resources, including, but not limited to, implementation, data tracking, and claiming.

(2) The guidance shall also provide information on how to access existing nursing resources for the provision of medically necessary onsite care for children, minors, and nonminor dependents placed by a county child welfare agency or probation department.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts awarded by the State Department of Social Services for purposes of this section shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts awarded by the State Department of Social Services for purposes of this section shall be exempt from the
 Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual and shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 86, Sec. 33.   (AB 153)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4096.6.

(a) For the purpose of this section, “family-based aftercare services” means an array of integrated services and supports that meets all of the following specifications:

(1) Are provided to or on behalf of a child for at least six months postdischarge from a short-term residential therapeutic program, a community treatment facility, or an out-of-state residential facility, as defined by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 7910 of the Family Code. Federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program shall only be available if all state and federal
 requirements are met and the service is medically necessary, regardless of the six months postdischarge requirement.

(2) Are family-based and implemented as part of an individualized, child-specific transition plan in a manner that supports the child’s permanency plan and incorporates the recommendations of the qualified individual.

(3) No later than October 1, 2022, meet the standards established pursuant to subdivision (c).

(b) (1) On and after October 1, 2021, each county child welfare agency, probation department, and mental health plan, in consultation with the local interagency leadership team established pursuant to Section 16521.6, shall jointly provide, arrange for, or ensure the provision of, at least six months of aftercare services for youth in the placement and care responsibility
 of the county child welfare or county probation agency who are discharged from a short-term residential therapeutic program, or from an out-of-state residential facility, as defined by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 7910 of the Family Code, to a family-based setting. Federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program shall only be available if all state and federal requirements are met and the service is medically necessary, regardless of the six months postdischarge requirement.

(2) On and after July 1, 2022, each county child welfare agency, probation department, and mental health plan, in consultation with the local interagency leadership team established pursuant to Section 16521.6, shall jointly provide, arrange for, or ensure the provision of, at least six months of aftercare services for youth in the placement and care responsibility
 of the county child welfare or county probation agency who are discharged from a community treatment facility, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, to a family-based setting. Federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program shall only be available if all state and federal requirements are met and the service is medically necessary, regardless of the six months postdischarge requirement.

(3) No later than October 1, 2021, county agencies shall leverage existing wraparound programs and other resources to provide at least six months of family-based aftercare
 services, while planning and incrementally implementing the standards established pursuant to subdivision (c).

(4) No later than October 1, 2023, or 12 months from the date the department issues written policy guidance regarding subdivision (c), whichever occurs later, county agencies shall jointly provide, arrange for, or ensure the provision of, at least
 6 months of family-based aftercare services consistent with the minimum requirements established pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) (1) The State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services shall establish, through regulation, statewide minimum standards for family-based aftercare services. Minimum standards shall be informed by stakeholder advisory groups convened by the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services and shall require, but shall not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The use of a California high-fidelity wraparound model, approved by the State Department of Social Services and consistent with the California Wraparound Standards and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18250) of Part 6 of Division 9, for aftercare
 services.

(B) A process through which a provider shall be certified to provide family-based aftercare services.

(C) Guidelines for ensuring each child, minor, or nonminor dependent discharged from a short-term residential therapeutic program, a community treatment facility, or an out-of-state residential facility, as defined by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 7910 of the Family Code, to family-based care is provided aftercare services pursuant to this section, including process guidance for circumstances in which children, minors, or nonminor dependents reside outside the county of jurisdiction.

(D) Workforce
 development, training, and curriculum requirements.

(E) Funding planning, which shall include, but not be limited to, controls and documentation to ensure that federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is only claimed if all state and federal requirements are met and the service is medically necessary.

(F) Data collection and outcome measures.

(2) No later than August 1, 2021, the State Department of Social Services, in partnership with the State Department of Health Care Services and in consultation with the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, Chief Probation Officers of California, tribes, child welfare advocates, providers, current or former foster children or youth, caregivers, and other interested stakeholders,
 shall issue guidance necessary to implement this section.

(d) Each county shall submit a plan to the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services for the provision of family-based aftercare services as follows:

(1) No later than October 1, 2021, each county shall submit a plan for the provision of family-based aftercare services in compliance with paragraph
 (3) of subdivision (b), including, but not limited to, how existing programs and resources will be leveraged to provide interim aftercare services until full implementation of subdivision (c).

(2) No later than October 1,
 2023, or 12 months from the date the department issues written policy guidance regarding subdivision (c), whichever occurs later, each county shall update and submit its plan for the provision of family-based aftercare services in compliance with the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) and consistent with the standards established pursuant to subdivision (c) and shall submit updates to the departments based on any modifications to its local plan.

(3) The State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services, or its designee, shall jointly review and approve county plans and updates to plans for family-based aftercare services.

(4) A county participating in an individualized or wraparound services program shall submit the plan for family-based aftercare services as a part of the plan developed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18250) of Part 6 of Division 9.

(e) For this section, federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program shall only be available if all state and federal requirements are met and the service is medically necessary, regardless of the six-month postdischarge requirement.

(f) The State Department of Health Care Services may issue guidance on the conditions under which federal financial participation is available for Medi-Cal services that intersect with the implementation of this section. Medi-Cal services shall only be claimed to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and medical
 assistance federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section concerning the provision of Medi-Cal services by means of plan or all-county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts awarded by the State Department of Social Services for purposes of this section shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts awarded by the State Department of Social Services for purposes of this section shall be exempt from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual and shall not be subject to the review or approval of the Department of General Services.

(3) This subdivision shall become inoperative on July 1, 2025, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before July 1, 2025, deletes or extends the date on which this subdivision becomes inoperative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 36.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Brandon’s Law [4097. - 4097.]

4097.

(a) The Legislature recognizes that some consumers with mental health diagnoses have disabling conditions, and that these consumers and their families are vulnerable and at risk of being easily victimized by fraudulent marketing practices that adversely impact the delivery of health care.

(b) To protect the health, safety, and welfare of this vulnerable population, an operator of a licensed psychiatric or mental health facility, as defined in subdivision (c), shall not do any of the following:

(1) Make a false or misleading statement or provide false or misleading information about the entity’s products, goods, services, or geographical locations in its marketing, advertising materials, or media, or on
 its internet website or on a third-party internet website.

(2) Make a false or misleading statement or provide false or misleading information about medical treatments or medical services offered in its marketing, advertising materials, or media, or on its internet website, on a third-party internet website, or in its social media presence.

(3) Include on its internet website a picture, description, staff information, or the location of an entity, along with false contact information that
 surreptitiously directs the reader to a business that does not have a contract with the entity.

(4) Include on its internet website false information or an electronic link that provides false information or surreptitiously directs the reader to another internet website.

(c) A licensed psychiatric or mental health facility subject to this section includes all of the following:

(1) A mental health rehabilitation center, as defined in
 Section 5675.

(2) A psychiatric health facility, as defined in Section 1250.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) A social rehabilitation facility, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) The department responsible for the licensing and regulation of the facility may investigate an allegation of a violation of this section and, upon finding a violation of this section, or any regulation adopted to enforce this section, may impose one or more of the sanctions described in Section 1548 of the Health and Safety Code, and Sections 4080 and 5675.1 of this code, in accordance with regulations adopted pursuant to those sections. A violation of this section shall not constitute a crime.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 172, Sec. 2.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Suicide Prevention Programs [4098. - 4098.5.]

4098.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Surgeon General of the United States has described suicide prevention as a serious public health priority, and has called upon each state to develop a strategy for suicide prevention using a public health approach.

(b) In 1996, 3,401 Californians lost their lives to suicide, an average of nine residents per day. It is estimated that there are between 75,000 and 100,000 suicide attempts in California every year. 11 percent of all suicides in the nation take place in California.

(c) Adolescents are far more likely to attempt suicide than their older California counterparts. Data indicate that there are 100 attempts for every adolescent suicide completed. In 1996, 207 California youth died by suicide. Using this estimate, there were likely more than 20,000 suicide attempts made by California adolescents, and approximately 20 percent of all the estimated suicide attempts occurred in California.

(d) Of all of the violent deaths associated with schools nationwide since 1992, 14 percent were suicides.

(e) Homicide and suicide rank as the third and fifth leading causes of death for youth, respectively. Both are preventable. While the death rates for unintentional injuries decreased by more than 40 percent between 1979 and 1996, the death rates for homicide and suicide increased for youth. Evidence is growing in terms of the links between suicide and other forms of violence. This provides compelling reasons for broadening the state’s scope in identifying risk factors for self-harmful behavior. The number of estimated youth suicide attempts; and the growing concerns of youth violence can best be addressed through the implementation of successful gatekeeper training programs to identify and refer youth at risk for self-harmful behavior.

(f) The American Association of Suicidology (AAS) conservatively estimates that the lives of at least six persons related to or connected to individuals who attempt or complete suicide are impacted. Using these estimates, in 1996, more than 600,000 Californians, or 1,644 individuals per day, struggled to cope with the impact of suicide.

(g) Restriction of access to lethal means significantly reduces the number of successful suicides.

(h) Actual incidents of suicide attempts are expected to be higher than reported because attempts not requiring medical attention are less likely to be reported. The underreporting of suicide completion is also likely since suicide classification involves conclusions regarding the intent of the deceased. The stigma associated with suicide is also likely to contribute to underreporting.

(i) Without interagency collaboration and support for proven, community-based, culturally competent suicide prevention and intervention programs, occurrences of suicide are likely to rise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 44.5.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4098.1.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Suicide Prevention Act of 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 190.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4098.2.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services, contingent upon appropriation in the annual Budget Act, may establish and implement a suicide prevention, education, and gatekeeper training program to reduce the severity, duration, and incidence of suicidal behaviors.

(b) In developing and implementing the components of this program, the department shall build upon the existing network of nonprofit suicide prevention programs in the state, and shall utilize the expertise of existing suicide prevention programs that
 meet any of the following criteria:

(1) Have been identified by a county as providing suicide prevention services for that county.

(2) Are certified by the American Association of Suicidology.

(3) Meet criteria for suicide prevention programs that may be established by the department.

(c) The program established by this section shall be consistent with the public health model proposed by the Surgeon General of the United States, and the system of care approach pursuant to the Bronzan-McCorquodale Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5600) of Division
 5).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 71.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4098.3.

The department may contract with an outside agency to establish and implement a targeted public awareness and education campaign on suicide prevention and treatment. Target populations shall include junior high and high school students, as well as other selected populations known to be at high risk of suicide.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 44.5.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4098.4.

(a) The department may contract with local mental health organizations and professionals with expertise in the assessment and treatment of suicidal behaviors to develop an evidence-based assessment and prevention program for suicide that may be integrated with local mental health departments or replicated by public or private suicide treatment programs, or both.

(b) This component may include the creation of guidebooks and training protocols to improve the intervention capabilities of caregivers who work with individuals at risk of suicide. Applicants may reflect several gatekeeper training models that can be replicated in other communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 44.5.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4098.5.

The department may establish and implement, or contract with an outside agency for the development of a multicounty, 24-hour, centralized suicide crisis line integrated network. Existing crisis lines that meet specifications of the department and the American Association of Suicidology may be included in this integrated network. The crisis line established under this section shall link persons at risk of committing suicide with local suicide prevention and treatment resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 44.5.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. ADMINISTRATION OF STATE INSTITUTIONS FOR THE MENTALLY DISORDERED [4100. - 4336.]



  CHAPTER 1. Jurisdiction and General Government [4100. - 4148.]

4100.

The department has jurisdiction over the following facilities:

(a) Atascadero State Hospital.

(b) Coalinga State Hospital.

(c) Metropolitan State Hospital.

(d) Napa State Hospital.

(e) Patton State Hospital.

(f) (1) The Admission, Evaluation, and Stabilization (AES) Center in the County of Kern, and other AES Centers as defined by regulation.

(2) The Director of State Hospitals
 may adopt emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division of 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to implement this subdivision. The adoption of emergency regulations under this paragraph is deemed to address an emergency, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the Director of State Hospitals is hereby exempted for this purpose from the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(g) A county jail treatment facility under contract with the State Department of State Hospitals to provide competency restoration services.

(h) A facility under contract with the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to Section 4361.6, excluding community-based
 restoration of competency services that are operated by the county.

(i) Any other State Department of State Hospitals facility subject to available funding by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 348.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4100.2.

(a) Commencing January 10, 2009, and each year thereafter, the State Department of Mental Health, or its successor, the State Department of State Hospitals, shall provide the fiscal committees of the Legislature with a fiscal estimate package for the current year and budget year for the state hospitals by January 10 and at the time of the Governor’s May Revision.

(b) At a minimum, the estimate package shall address patient caseload by commitment category, non-level-of-care and level-of-care staffing requirements, and operating expenses and equipment.

(c) In addition to subdivision (b), each estimate submitted shall
 include all of the following:

(1) A statement articulating the assumptions and methodologies used for calculating the patient caseload factors, all staffing costs, and operating expenses and equipment.

(2) Where applicable, individual policy changes shall contain a narrative and basis for its proposed and estimated costs.

(3) Fiscal bridge charts shall be included to provide the basis for the year-to-year changes.

(d) The department may provide any additional information as deemed appropriate to provide a comprehensive fiscal perspective to the Legislature for analysis and deliberations for purposes of appropriation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 78.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4100.5.

The department may contract with the State Department of Developmental Services to provide services to persons with mental disorders in state hospitals under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Developmental Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

4101.

Except as otherwise specifically provided elsewhere in this code, all of the institutions under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals shall be governed by uniform rule and regulation of the State Department of State Hospitals and all of the provisions of this chapter shall apply to the conduct and management of those institutions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 79.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4101.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the State Department of State Hospitals may contract with providers of health care services and health care network providers, including, but not limited to, health plans, preferred provider organizations, and other health care network managers. Hospitals that do not contract with the department for emergency health care services shall provide these services to the department on the same basis as they are required to provide these services pursuant to Section 489.24 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) The department may only reimburse a noncontract provider of hospital or physician services at a rate equal to or less than the amount payable under the Medicare Fee
 Schedule, regardless of whether the hospital is located within or outside of California. An entity that provides ambulance or any other emergency or nonemergency response service to the department, and that does not contract with the department for that service, shall be reimbursed for the service at the rate payable under the Medicare Fee Schedule, regardless of whether the provider is located within or outside of California.

(c) Until regulations or emergency regulations are adopted in accordance with subdivision (g), the department shall not reimburse a contract provider of hospital services at a rate that exceeds 130 percent of the amount payable under the Medicare Fee Schedule, a contract provider of physician services at a rate that exceeds 110 percent of the amount payable under the Medicare Fee Schedule, or a contract provider of ambulance services at a rate that exceeds 120 percent of the amount payable under the Medicare Fee Schedule.
 The maximum rates established by this subdivision shall not apply to reimbursement for administrative days, transplant services, services provided pursuant to competitively bid contracts, or services provided pursuant to a contract executed prior to September 1, 2009.

(d) The maximum rates set forth in this section shall not apply to contracts entered into through the department’s designated health care network provider, if any. The rates for those contracts shall be negotiated at the lowest rate possible under the circumstances.

(e) The department and its designated health care network provider may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts on a bid or negotiated basis for hospital, physician, and ambulance services contracts.

(f) The Director of State Hospitals may adopt regulations to implement this section.
 The adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation authorized by this section is hereby exempted from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(g) The Director of State Hospitals may change the maximum rates set forth in this section by regulation or emergency regulation, adopted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, but no sooner than 30 days after notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. Those changes may include, but are not limited to, increasing or decreasing rates, or adding location-based differentials such as those provided to small and rural hospitals as defined in Section 124840 of the Health and Safety Code. The adoption, amendment, repeal, or readoption of a regulation authorized by this subdivision is deemed to address an emergency, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6
 of the Government Code, and the director is hereby exempted for this purpose from the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(h) For persons who are transferred from the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to, or are housed in, a state hospital or psychiatric program under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals, and while these persons remain under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation as inmates or parolees, health care or emergency services provided for these persons outside of a State Department of State Hospitals state hospital or psychiatric program shall continue to be paid for or reimbursed by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation in accordance with Section 5023.5 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 80.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4102.

Each state hospital is a corporation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

4103.

Each such corporation may acquire and hold in its corporate name by gift, grant, devise, or bequest property to be applied to the maintenance of the patients of the hospital and for the general use of the corporation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

4104.

All lands necessary for the use of the state hospitals specified in Section 4100, except those acquired by gift, devise, or purchase, shall be acquired by condemnation as lands for other public uses are acquired.

The terms of every purchase shall be approved by the State Department of State Hospitals. No public street or road for railway or other purposes, except for hospital use, shall be opened through the lands of any state hospital, unless the Legislature by special enactment consents thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 81.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4105.

The Director of General Services shall grant to the County of San Bernardino under such terms, conditions, and restrictions as he or she deems to be for the best interests of the state, the necessary easements and rights-of-way for all purposes of a public road on the Patton State Hospital property. The right-of-way shall be across, along, and upon the following described property:

The east 40 feet of the east one-half of the northwest one-quarter of Section 32, Township 1 North, Range 3 West, San Bernardino Base and Meridian, in the County of San Bernardino, State of California.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4445.5 by Stats. 1986, Ch. 224, Sec. 9.   Effective June 30, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

4106.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 4104, the Director of General Services, with the consent of the State Department of State Hospitals, may grant to the County of Napa a right-of-way for public road purposes over the northerly portion of the Napa State Hospital lands for the widening of Imola Avenue between Penny Lane and Fourth Avenue, upon such terms and conditions as the Director of General Services may deem for the best interests of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 82.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4107.

(a) The security of patients committed pursuant to Section 1026 of, and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1367) of Title 10 of Part 2 of, the Penal Code, and former Sections 6316 and 6321, at Patton State Hospital shall be the responsibility of the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(b) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the State Department of Mental Health shall jointly develop a plan to transfer all patients committed to Patton State Hospital pursuant to the provisions in subdivision (a) from Patton State Hospital no later than January 1, 1986, and shall transmit this plan to the Senate Committee on Judiciary and to the Assembly Committee on Criminal Justice, and to the Senate Health and Welfare Committee and Assembly
 Health Committee by June 30, 1983. The plan shall address whether the transferred patients shall be moved to other state hospitals or to correctional facilities, or both, for commitment and treatment.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the State Department of State Hospitals shall house no more than 1,336 patients at Patton State Hospital. However, until September 2030, up to 1,530 patients may be housed at the hospital.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until all patients committed, pursuant to the provisions enumerated in subdivision (a), have been removed from Patton State Hospital and shall have no force or effect on or after that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 12, Sec. 38.   (AB 80)   Effective June 29, 2020.   Section inoperative on date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4107.1.
